Arkansas, session 2025, SB395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-8-701(d)(3) and (4), concerning the
information included in the statement of financial interest and resulting
from Initiated Act 1 of 1988, are amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) Identification of each:
(A)(i) Employer employer and of each other source of gross
income amounting to more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) annually received
by the person or his or her spouse in his or her own name, or by any other
person for the use or benefit of the public servant or candidate or his or
her spouse, and a brief description of the nature of the services for which
the compensation was received.
(ii)(B) However, this subdivision (d)(3)(A) of this
section does not require the disclosure of individual items of income that
constitute a portion of the gross income of the business or profession from
which the public servant or candidate or his or her spouse derives income;
*MBM161*
03/05/2025 3:39:05 PM MBM161

SB395
and
(B)(i) Source of gross income as described in subdivision
(d)(3)(A) of this section of more than twelve thousand five hundred dollars
($12,500).
(ii) However, this subdivision (d)(3)(B) does not
require the disclosure of individual items of income that constitute a
portion of the gross income of the business or profession from which the
public servant or candidate or his or her spouse derives income;
(4)(A) The name and address of every business in which the
public servant or candidate or his or her spouse, or any other person for the
use or benefit of the public servant or candidate or his or her spouse, has
had an investment or holdings of over one thousand dollars ($1,000) at fair
market value as of the last day of holding at any point during the previous
calendar year.
(B) Each source described in subdivision (d)(4)(A)
of this section that has a fair market value of over twelve thousand five
hundred dollars ($12,500) as of the last day of the previous calendar year
shall also be identified; (B) As used in this subdivision (d)(4),
"investment or holding":
(i) Includes without limitation:
(a) Stocks;
(b) Bonds;
(c) Futures contracts;
(d) Options contracts;
(e) Oil and gas interests; and
(f) Any other security held by the public
servant or candidate or his or her spouse at any point during the previous
calendar year; and
(ii) Does not include:
(a) Investments in publicly traded United
States Government securities; or
(b) Individual stocks or bonds fully managed
by a retirement system or a pension system.
(C) If the business under subdivision (d)(4)(A) of this
section is publicly traded, the stock symbol of the business shall be
included with the name of the business in lieu of the address of the
03/05/2025 3:39:05 PM MBM161

SB395
business.

(D) Subdivision (d)(4)(A) of this section does not require
the identification of a bank or brokerage company in which an investment or
holding is maintained.
(E) If a person required to file a report under this
section has investments or holdings within a trust or a business in which the
person filing the report owns more than one percent (1%) of the stock of the
business, including without limitation an investment or holding under
subdivision (d)(4)(A)(i) of this section, that would otherwise be identified
under subdivision (d)(4)(A) of this section, he or she shall report those
investments or holdings as though they were held personally;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 21-8-701, concerning the statement of
financial interest and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1988, is amended to
add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(g) This section does not restrict the power of the Arkansas Ethics
Commission to conduct an investigation under its jurisdiction.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 8, Subchapter 7, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-8-706. Unlawful use of information in a statement of financial
interest.
(a) A person commits the offense of unlawful use of information in a
statement of financial interest if he or she purposely uses the information
contained within a statement of financial interest under this subchapter to
commit a crime against:
(1) The person filing the statement of financial interest;
(2) The spouse or child of the person filing the statement of
financial interest; or
(3) A business in which the person filing the statement of
financial interest owns more than one percent (1%) of the stock of the
business.
(b) The offense of unlawful use of information in a statement of
financial interest is a Class A misdemeanor.

03/05/2025 3:39:05 PM MBM161